Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4215.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [84.7885] UNLAWFUL ACTS RELATED TO REGISTRATION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Violations. new text end new text begin With regard to any registration or temporary registration issued under section 84.788, it is unlawful for any person or dealer: new text end new text begin (1) to issue, obtain, or use a dealer temporary 21-day registration permit without the intent to follow through with a sale and registration; new text end new text begin (2) to obtain, attempt to obtain, or assist in obtaining a registration through misrepresentation or fraud by knowingly providing incorrect, misleading, incomplete, or materially untrue information in the registration application; or new text end new text begin (3) to display, cause or permit to be displayed, or have in possession any fictitious or fraudulent registration or decal. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin (a) A dealer temporary 21-day registration permit, registration, or registration sticker that is the subject of a violation under subdivision 1 is void. new text end new text begin (b) A person who violates subdivision 1 is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (c) A dealer who violates subdivision 1 is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [84.7985] UNLAWFUL ACTS RELATED TO REGISTRATION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Violations. new text end new text begin With regard to any registration or temporary registration issued under section 84.798, it is unlawful for any person or dealer: new text end new text begin (1) to issue, obtain, or use a dealer temporary 21-day registration permit without the intent to follow through with a sale and registration; new text end new text begin (2) to obtain, attempt to obtain, or assist in obtaining a registration through misrepresentation or fraud by knowingly providing incorrect, misleading, incomplete, or materially untrue information in the registration application; or new text end new text begin (3) to display, cause or permit to be displayed, or have in possession any fictitious or fraudulent registration or decal. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin (a) A dealer temporary 21-day registration permit, registration, or registration sticker that is the subject of a violation under subdivision 1 is void. new text end new text begin (b) A person who violates subdivision 1 is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (c) A dealer who violates subdivision 1 is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.8035, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Pass required; fee. (a) Except as provided under paragraph (c), a person may not operate an off-road vehicle on a state or grant-in-aid off-road vehicle trail or use area unless the deleted text begin vehicle displays andeleted text end new text begin operator carries a validnew text end off-road vehicle state trail pass issued according to this section. The pass must be available deleted text begin to be vieweddeleted text end new text begin for inspectionnew text end by a peace officer, a conservation officer, or an employee designated under section 84.0835. (b) The commissioner of natural resources shall issue a pass upon application and payment of the fee. Fees collected under this section, except for the issuing fee for licensing agents, shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the off-road vehicle account in the natural resources fund and, except for the electronic licensing system commission established by the commissioner under section 84.027, subdivision 15, must be used for grants-in-aid to counties and municipalities for off-road vehicle organizations to construct and maintain off-road vehicle trails and use areas. (c) An off-road vehicle state trail pass is not required for: (1) an off-road vehicle that is owned and used by the United States, another state, or a political subdivision thereof that is exempt from registration under section 84.798, subdivision 2; (2) a person operating an off-road vehicle only on the portion of a trail that is owned by the person or the person's spouse, child, or parent; or (3) a person operating an off-road vehicle that is registered according to section 84.798. (d) The fee for an annual nonresident off-road vehicle state trail pass is $20. The nonresident pass is valid from January 1 through December 31. The fee for a nonresident three-year pass is $30. (e) The fee for a resident off-road vehicle state trail pass is $20. The resident pass is valid for 30 consecutive days after the date of issuance. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon full implementation of the replacement electronic license system. The commissioner of natural resources must notify the revisor of statutes when the replacement electronic license system is fully implemented. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.82, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 12. new text end new text begin Unlawful acts related to registration. new text end new text begin (a) It is unlawful for any person: new text end new text begin (1) to issue, obtain, or use a dealer temporary 21-day registration permit without the intent to follow through with a sale and registration; new text end new text begin (2) to register or attempt to register a snowmobile through misrepresentation or fraud by knowingly providing incorrect, misleading, incomplete, or materially untrue information in the registration application; or new text end new text begin (3) to display, cause or permit to be displayed, or have in possession any fictitious or fraudulent registration or decal. new text end new text begin (b) A dealer temporary 21-day registration permit, registration, or decal that is the subject of a violation under paragraph (a) is void. new text end new text begin (c) A person who violates paragraph (a) is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (d) A dealer who violates paragraph (a) is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84.8205, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin A person who makes a false statement related to an application for a snowmobile state trail pass, materially alters or creates a fictitious snowmobile state trail pass, or uses or attempts to use a materially altered, fictitious, or otherwise fraudulent snowmobile state trail pass is guilty of a misdemeanor, and the pass is rendered void. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [84.9225] UNLAWFUL ACTS RELATED TO REGISTRATION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Violations. new text end new text begin With regard to any registration or temporary registration issued under section 84.922, it is unlawful for any person or dealer: new text end new text begin (1) to issue, obtain, or use a dealer temporary 21-day registration permit without the intent to follow through with a sale and registration; new text end new text begin (2) to obtain, attempt to obtain, or assist in obtaining a registration through misrepresentation or fraud by knowingly providing incorrect, misleading, incomplete, or materially untrue information in the registration application; or new text end new text begin (3) to display, cause or permit to be displayed, or have in possession any fictitious or fraudulent registration or decal. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin (a) A dealer temporary 21-day registration permit, registration, or registration sticker that is the subject of a violation under subdivision 1 is void. new text end new text begin (b) A person who violates subdivision 1 is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (c) A dealer who violates subdivision 1 is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84D.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6a. new text end new text begin Eviscerated. new text end new text begin "Eviscerated" means to have the internal organs removed from the body cavity or to have the gills severed to ensure that an organism is dead. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 84D.05, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Prohibited activities. A person may not possess, import, purchase, sell, propagate, transport, or introduce a prohibited invasive species, except: (1) under a permit issued by the commissioner under section 84D.11; (2) in the case of purple loosestrife, as provided by sections 18.75 to 18.88; (3) under a restricted species permit issued under section 17.457; new text begin (4) a person may possess, import, purchase, sell, and transport bighead carp, grass carp, and silver carp if the fish are eviscerated; new text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end when being transported to the department, or another destination as the commissioner may direct, in a sealed container for purposes of identifying the species or reporting the presence of the species; deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end when being transported for disposal as part of a harvest or control activity when specifically authorized under a permit issued by the commissioner according to section 103G.615, when being transported for disposal as specified under a commercial fishing license issued by the commissioner according to section 97A.418, 97C.801, 97C.811, 97C.825, 97C.831, or 97C.835, or when being transported as specified by the commissioner; deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end when being removed from watercraft and equipment, or caught while angling, and immediately returned to the water from which they came; deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end when being transported from riparian property to a legal disposal site that is at least 100 feet from any surface water, ditch, or seasonally flooded land, provided the prohibited invasive species are in a covered commercial vehicle specifically designed and used for hauling trash; or deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end as the commissioner may otherwise prescribe by rule. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 85.053, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 11. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin A person who makes a false statement related to an application for a state park permit, materially alters or creates a fictitious state park permit, or uses or attempts to use a materially altered, fictitious, or otherwise fraudulent state park permit is guilty of a misdemeanor, and the permit is void. new text end Sec. 10. new text begin [85.48] PENALTIES; FALSE STATEMENTS OR ALTERATIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin False statement. new text end new text begin A person who makes a false statement related to an application for a cross-country-ski pass or a horse pass is guilty of a misdemeanor, and the pass is void. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Altered or fictitious pass. new text end new text begin A person who materially alters or creates a fictitious cross-country-ski pass or horse pass or uses or attempts to use a materially altered, fictitious, or otherwise fraudulent cross-country-ski pass or horse pass is guilty of a misdemeanor, and the pass is void. new text end Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 86B.30, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Exempt operator. "Exempt operator" means a motorboat operator, including a personal watercraft operator, who is 12 years of age or older and who: (1) possesses a valid license to operate a motorboat issued for maritime personnel by the United States Coast Guard under Code of Federal Regulations, title 46, part 10, or a marine certificate issued by the Canadian government; (2) is not a resident of the state, is temporarily using the waters of the state for a period not to exceed 60 days, and: (i) meets any applicable requirements of the state or country of residency; or (ii) possesses a Canadian pleasure craft operator's card; (3) is operating a motorboat under a dealer's license according to section 86B.405; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (4) is operating a motorboat during an emergencydeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (5) was born: new text end new text begin (i) before July 1, 2004, effective July 1, 2025; new text end new text begin (ii) before July 1, 2000, effective July 1, 2026; new text end new text begin (iii) before July 1, 1996, effective July 1, 2027; and new text end new text begin (iv) before July 1, 1987, effective July 2, 2028. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 86B.303, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Young operators. (a) A young operator may not operate a personal watercraft or any motorboat powered by a motor with a factory rating of deleted text begin more thandeleted text end 75 horsepowernew text begin or morenew text end . (b) A young operator may operate a motorboat that is not a personal watercraft and that is powered by a motor with a factory rating of less than 75 horsepower if an accompanying operator is in the motorboat. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 86B.306, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Requirements. A motorboat rental business must not rent or lease a motorboat, including a personal watercraft, to any person for operation on waters of this state unless the renter or lesseenew text begin is 18 years of age or older andnew text end : (1) has a valid watercraft operator's permit deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2)new text end is an exempt operator; deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ornew text end deleted text begin (2) is 18 years of age or older. deleted text end new text begin (3) has taken the short boater safety examination within the previous 180 days. new text end Sec. 14. new text begin [86B.425] UNLAWFUL ACTS RELATED TO LICENSE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Violations. new text end new text begin With regard to any license issued under section 86B.401, 86B.405, or 86B.411, it is unlawful for any person or dealer: new text end new text begin (1) to issue, obtain, or use a temporary license certificate without the intent to follow through with the license application and sale; new text end new text begin (2) to obtain or attempt to obtain a license or registration sticker through misrepresentation or fraud by knowingly providing incorrect, misleading, incomplete, or materially untrue information in the license application; or new text end new text begin (3) to display, cause or permit to be displayed, or have in possession any fictitious or fraudulent license or registration sticker. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin (a) A temporary license certificate, license, or registration sticker that is the subject of a violation under subdivision 1 is void. new text end new text begin (b) A person who violates subdivision 1 is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text end new text begin (c) A dealer who violates subdivision 1 is guilty of a gross misdemeanor. new text end Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.311, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. deleted text begin Alteringdeleted text end new text begin Fictitious or alterednew text end licensenew text begin or permitnew text end . A person that alters a license new text begin or permit new text end in a material mannernew text begin , creates a fictitious license or permit, buys or sells a fictitious or materially altered license or permit, or uses or attempts to use a materially altered, fictitious, or otherwise fraudulent license or permitnew text end is guilty of a misdemeanornew text begin and subject to the penalties in subdivision 7new text end . Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.311, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. False statement. A person that knowingly makes a false statement related to an application for a licensedeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin or permit or related tonew text end a license, new text begin permit, new text end or certificatedeleted text begin ,deleted text end required by or issued under the game and fish lawsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end is guilty of a misdemeanornew text begin and subject to the penalties in subdivision 7new text end . Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.311, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin A license or permit that is the subject of a violation under subdivision 1 or 2 is void, and the person convicted of violating subdivision 1 or 2 is subject to the following penalties: new text end new text begin (1) upon first conviction, the person may not obtain a license or permit of that type for one year; new text end new text begin (2) upon second conviction, all the person's licenses to take wild animals are void and the person may not obtain a license to take a wild animal or a permit of that type for one year; and new text end new text begin (3) upon third conviction, all the person's licenses to take wild animals are void and the person may not obtain a license to take a wild animal or a permit of that type for five years. new text end Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.411, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Voluntary license invalidation. new text end new text begin A person who establishes residency outside the state may request in writing that their resident licenses be invalidated. No refunds of the licenses or issuing fees may be issued. new text end Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97A.485, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Licenses to be sold and issuing fees. (a) Persons authorized to sell licenses under this section must issue the following licenses for the license fee and the following issuing fees: (1) to take deer or bear with firearms and by archery, the issuing fee is $1; (2) Minnesota sporting, the issuing fee is $1; (3) to take small game, to take fish by angling or by spearing, and to trap fur-bearing animals, the issuing fee is $1; (4) to apply for a limited hunt drawing, the issuing fee is $1 unless the application requires a license purchase at the time of application and the license purchase requires an application fee; (5) for a prairie-chicken license, the issuing fee is $1; (6) for a turkey license, the issuing fee is $1; (7) for an elk license, the issuing fee is $1; (8) for a moose license, the issuing fee is $1; (9) for a wolf license, the issuing fee is $1; (10) for a stamp validation that is not issued simultaneously with a license, an issuing fee of 50 cents may be charged at the discretion of the authorized seller; (11) for stamp validations issued simultaneously with a license, there is no fee; (12) for licenses, seals, tags, or coupons issued without a fee under section 97A.441, subdivisions 1 to 6a, or 97A.465, there is no fee; (13) for lifetime licenses, there is no fee; and (14) for all other licenses, permits, renewals, or applications or any other transaction through the electronic licensing system under this chapter or any other chapter when an issuing fee is not specified, an issuing fee of $1 may be charged at the discretion of the authorized seller. (b) Only one issuing fee may be collected when selling more than one stamp in the same transaction after the end of the season for which the stamp was issued. (c) The agent shall keep the issuing fee as a commission for selling the licenses. (d) The commissioner shall collect the issuing fee on licenses sold by the commissioner. (e) A new text begin receipt for a new text end license, except stamps, must state the amount of the issuing fee and that the issuing fee is kept by the seller as a commission for selling the licenses. (f) For duplicate licenses, including licenses issued without a fee, the issuing fees are: (1) for licenses to take big game, 75 cents; and (2) for other licenses, 50 cents. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon full implementation of the replacement electronic license system. The commissioner of natural resources must notify the revisor of statutes when the replacement electronic license system is fully implemented. new text end Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97C.417, is amended to read: 97C.417 REPORTING INVASIVE CARP. A person who takes any of the following invasive carp species must report the type of carp taken to the commissioner within seven days of taking: (1) grass carp (Ctenopharyngodon idella); (2) bighead carp (Hypophthalmichthys nobilis); deleted text begin ordeleted text end (3) silver carp (Hypophthalmichthys molitrix)deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (4) black carp (Mylopharyngodon piceus). new text end Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97C.835, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Types of fish permitted. Lake trout, ciscoes, chubs, alewives, lake whitefish, round whitefish, pygmy whitefish, rainbow smelt, common carp, new text begin burbot, new text end and native rough fish may be taken by licensed commercial fishing operators from Lake Superior, in accordance with this section. Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 103G.291, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Water supply plans; demand reduction. (a) Every public water supplier serving more than 1,000 people must submit a water supply plan to the commissioner for approval by January 1, 1996. In accordance with guidelines developed by the commissioner, the plan must address projected demands, adequacy of the water supply system and planned improvements, existing and future water sources, natural resource impacts or limitations, emergency preparedness, water conservation, supply and demand reduction measures, and allocation priorities that are consistent with section 103G.261. Public water suppliers must update their plan and, upon notification, submit it to the commissioner for approval every ten years. (b) The water supply plan in paragraph (a) is required for all communities in the metropolitan area, as defined in section 473.121, with a municipal water supply system and is a required element of the local comprehensive plan required under section 473.859. (c) Public water suppliers serving more than 1,000 people must encourage water conservation by employing water use demand reduction measures, as defined in subdivision 4, paragraph (a), before requesting approval from the commissioner of health under section 144.383, paragraph (a), to construct a public water supply well or requesting an increase in the authorized volume of appropriation. The commissioner of natural resources and the water supplier shall use a collaborative process to achieve demand reduction measures as a part of a water supply plan review process. (d) Public water suppliers serving more than 1,000 people must submit records that indicate the number of connections and amount of use by customer category andnew text begin thenew text end volume of new text begin real and apparent new text end water deleted text begin unaccounted fordeleted text end new text begin lossesnew text end with the annual report of water use required under section 103G.281, subdivision 3. (e) For the purposes of this section, "public water supplier" means an entity that owns, manages, or operates a public water supply, as defined in section 144.382, subdivision 4. Sec. 23. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 97C.836, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-06075 97C.836 LAKE SUPERIOR LAKE TROUT; EXPANDED ASSESSMENT HARVEST. The commissioner shall provide for taking of lake trout by licensed commercial operators in Lake Superior management zones MN-3 and MN-2 for expanded assessment and sale. The commissioner shall authorize expanded assessment taking and sale of lake trout in Lake Superior management zone MN-3 beginning annually in 2007 and zone MN-2 beginning annually in 2010. Total assessment taking and sale may not exceed 3,000 lake trout in zone MN-3 and 2,000 lake trout in zone MN-2 and may be reduced when necessary to protect the lake trout population or to manage the effects of invasive species or fish disease. Taking lake trout for expanded assessment and sale shall be allowed from June 1 through September 30, but may end earlier in the respective zones if the quotas are reached. The quotas must be reassessed at the expiration of the current ten-year Fisheries Management Plan for the Minnesota Waters of Lake Superior.